Alaska, session 34, HB384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 18.66.250(5) is amended to read: 05 (5) "victim counseling center" means a private organization, an 06 organization operated by or contracted by a branch of the armed forces of the United 07 States, or a local or tribal government agency that 08 (A) has, as one of its primary purposes, the provision of direct 09 services to victims for trauma resulting from a sexual assault or domestic 10 violence; 11 (B) is not affiliated with a law enforcement agency or a 12 prosecutor's office; and 13 (C) is not on contract with the state to provide services under 14 AS 47; 01 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 02 read: 03 APPLICABILITY. AS 18.66.250(5), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to 04 communications made before, on, or after the effective date of this Act for offenses 05 committed before, on, or after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.